Idaho, session 2025, H0049.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 20, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 11, Title 20, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 11
SAFETY AND PRIVACY IN CERTAIN COVERED ENTITIES
20-1101. PURPOSE. The purposes of this chapter are:
(1) To clarify the meaning of sex, male, and female in state law; and
(2) To preserve order and dignity in women's restrooms, changing rooms,
and sleeping quarters for women in facilities where women have been tradi-
tionally afforded privacy and safety from acts of abuse, harassment, sexual
assault, and violence committed by men.
20-1102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Changing room" means a room or area in which a person may be in a
state of undress in the presence of others, including a locker room or shower
room.
(2) "Correctional facility" means a state correctional facility or lo-
cal correctional facility as defined in section 19-4201A, Idaho Code.
(3) "Covered entity" means a correctional facility, domestic violence
shelter, juvenile correctional center, public building, or state educa-
tional institution.
(4) "Domestic violence shelter" means a state-operated facility that
provides services, including food, housing, counseling, and assistance to
victims of domestic violence or abuse and their minor dependent children in
this state.
(5) "Female" has the same meaning as set forth in section 73-114, Idaho
Code.
(6) "Juvenile correctional center" means any state-operated residen-
tial facility or facility operated pursuant to a contract with the state that
provides twenty-four (24) hour supervision and confinement for juvenile of-
fenders committed to the custody of the department of juvenile corrections.
(7) "Male" has the same meaning as set forth in section 73-114, Idaho
Code.


(8) "Multi-occupancy" means a space that is designated for use by mul-
tiple persons simultaneously.
(9) "Public building" means all county courthouses and all city halls
and buildings used primarily as governmental offices of the state or any
county or city.
(10) "Restroom" means a room that includes one (1) or more toilets or
urinals.
(11) "Sex" has the same meaning as set forth in section 73-114, Idaho
Code.
(12) "Sleeping quarters" means a room with more than one (1) bed and in
which more than one (1) individual is housed overnight.
(13) "State educational institution" means the university of Idaho,
Lewis-Clark state college, Idaho state university, Boise state university,
the school for the deaf and the blind, and any public community colleges un-
der the general supervision, governance, and control of the state board of
education.
20-1103. SAFETY AND PRIVACY IN COVERED ENTITIES. (1) A covered entity
shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, and sleeping
quarters for the exclusive use by either females or males.
(2) Every restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarters within a cov-
ered entity that is designated for females or males shall only be used by mem-
bers of that sex. No individual shall enter a restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarters that is designated for females or males unless such indi-
vidual is a member of that sex.
(3) A covered entity shall take reasonable steps to provide individuals
with privacy in restrooms, changing rooms, and sleeping quarters from mem-
bers of the opposite sex.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to an individual who
enters a restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarters designated for the
opposite sex in any of the following circumstances:
(a) To perform custodial services or maintenance;
(b) To render medical assistance;
(c) To render assistance by law enforcement; or
(d) To provide services or render aid during a natural disaster, a de-
clared emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat to good
order or safety.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a covered en-
tity from:
(a) Adopting policies necessary to accommodate persons protected under
the Americans with disabilities act, young children in need of assis-
tance, or elderly persons requiring aid;
(b) Establishing single-occupancy restrooms, changing rooms, or
sleeping quarters or family restrooms, changing rooms, or sleeping
quarters; or
(c) Redesignating a multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, or sleep-
ing quarters designated for exclusive use by one (1) sex to a designa-
tion for exclusive use by the opposite sex.


20-1104. REMEDIES. (1) An individual who, while accessing a restroom
or changing room designated for use by such individual's sex, encounters a
person of the opposite sex in such restroom or changing room shall have a pri-
vate cause of action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the cov-
ered entity if the covered entity:
(a) Provided the person permission to use a restroom or changing room of
the opposite sex; or
(b) Failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the person of the oppo-
site sex from using the restroom or changing room of the opposite sex.
(2) An individual who is required by the covered entity to share sleep-
ing quarters with a person of the opposite sex shall have a private cause of
action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the covered entity.
(3) All civil actions brought pursuant to this section must be initi-
ated within two (2) years after the violation occurred. An individual ag-
grieved under the provisions of this section who prevails in court may re-
cover reasonable attorney's fees and costs from the offending covered en-
tity.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.